Maryland, session 2026, HB1323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1323*

HOUSE BILL 1323
Article – Health – General
5–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(X) “SURROGATE COMMITTEE” MEANS A COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED BY A
HOSPITAL UNDER § 5–604.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(x)] (Y) “Terminal condition” means an incurable condition caused by injury,
disease, or illness which, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, makes death
imminent and from which, despite the application of life–sustaining procedures, there can
be no recovery.
(Z) “UNREPRESENTED PATIENT” MEANS A PATIENT:
(1) WHO HAS BEEN CERTIFIED TO BE INCAPABLE OF MAKING AN
INFORMED DECISION UNDER § 5–606(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) WHO IS RECEIVING CARE IN A HOSPITAL;
(3) WHO DOES NOT HAVE AN ADVANCE DIRECTIVE;
(4) FOR WHOM AN IDENTIFIABLE SURROGATE LISTED IN §
5–605(A)(2)(I), (II), (III), (IV), (V), OR (VI) OF THIS SUBTITLE IS UNAVAILABLE; AND
(5) FOR WHOM THERE IS NO OTHER EVIDENCE FROM THE PATIENT’S
HISTORY OR FROM OTHER PARTIES THAT IS SUFFICIENT TO SUPPORT A
REASONABLY CONCLUSIVE JUDGMENT ABOUT WHAT THE PATIENT WOULD LIKELY
CHOOSE REGARDING MEDICAL TREATMENT.
5–604.2.
(A) EACH HOSPITAL SHALL ESTABLISH A SURROGATE COMMITTEE TO
PROVIDE SURROGATE DECISION MAKING FOR AN UNREPRESENTED PATIENT.
(B) A SURROGATE COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIST OF:
(1) A PHYSICIAN WHO:
(I) WORKS OR HAS WORKED IN THE HOSPITAL; AND
(II) IS NOT INVOLVED IN THE TREATMENT OF THE
UNREPRESENTED PATIENT;

HOUSE BILL 1323 3
(2) A NURSE WHO:
(I) WORKS OR HAS WORKED IN THE HOSPITAL; AND
(II) IS NOT INVOLVED IN THE TREATMENT OF THE
UNREPRESENTED PATIENT;
(3) A SOCIAL WORKER OR A MEMBER OF THE CLERGY WHO WORKS OR
HAS WORKED IN THE HOSPITAL;
(4) A MEMBER OF THE HOSPITAL’S PATIENT CARE ADVISORY
COMMITTEE;
(5) A PATIENT ADVOCATE WHO IS NOT AFFILIATED WITH THE
HOSPITAL AND WHO MAY BE:
(I) AN ATTORNEY WHO REPRESENTS OR SERVES INDIVIDUALS
WITH HEALTH CARE ISSUES;
(II) A SOCIAL WORKER WHO REPRESENTS OR SERVES
INDIVIDUALS WITH HEALTH CARE ISSUES; OR
(III) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO WORKS FOR AN ENTITY THAT
PROVIDES PATIENT ADVOCACY SERVICES;
(6) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT EMPLOYED BY THE HOSPITAL AND
WHO IS OR HAS BEEN:
(I) A PATIENT IN THE HOSPITAL OR THE HEALTH CARE SYSTEM
WITH WHICH THE HOSPITAL IS AFFILIATED; OR
(II) A CARETAKER OF A PATIENT WHO LACKS
DECISION–MAKING CAPACITY; AND
(7) (I) AN EMPLOYEE OR A VOLUNTEER AFFILIATED WITH A
DISABILITY OR AGING PERSONS ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION; OR
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A DISABILITY.
(C) BEFORE SERVING ON A SURROGATE COMMITTEE, AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL
COMPLETE A TRAINING COURSE DEVELOPED OR ENDORSED BY THE OFFICE OF
HEALTH CARE QUALITY WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF

HOUSE BILL 1323
HUMAN SERVICES, WITH INPUT FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES, THAT
INCLUDES CONTENT ADDRESSING:
(1) CORE BIOETHICAL PRINCIPLES AND THE RELEVANT PROVISIONS
OF THE HEALTH CARE DECISIONS ACT INCLUDING:
(I) SURROGATE DECISION MAKING;
(II) INFORMED CONSENT AND EMERGENCY EXCEPTIONS TO
INFORMED CONSENT REQUIREMENTS;
(III) CAPACITY ASSESSMENT;
(IV) SUBSTITUTED JUDGMENT; AND
(V) THE BEST INTEREST STANDARD;
(2) DUE PROCESS PROTECTIONS;
(3) PATIENT RIGHTS;
(4) INFORMATION ON WHEN CONSULTATION WITH THE PATIENT
CARE ADVISORY COMMITTEE IS APPROPRIATE;
(5) PATIENT CONFIDENTIALITY;
(6) DOCUMENTATION REQUIREMENTS;
(7) CONFLICTS OF INTEREST; AND
(8) IMPLICIT BIAS, WITH A FOCUS ON BIAS RELATED TO RACE,
ETHNICITY, SEX, GENDER, DISABILITY, SOCIOECONOMIC STATUS, AND
IMMIGRATION STATUS.
(D) (1) THE PROCEEDINGS AND DELIBERATIONS OF A SURROGATE
COMMITTEE SHALL BE CONFIDENTIAL.
(2) THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE SHALL BE ABLE TO RECEIVE AND
REVIEW ALL RELEVANT MEDICAL RECORDS SUBJECT TO APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND
STATE LAW AND REGULATION.
(3) THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE MAY NOT DISCLOSE DOCUMENTS
OR MATERIAL THAT ARE CONFIDENTIAL UNDER LAW OR REGULATION.

HOUSE BILL 1323 5
(E) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH YEAR, A HOSPITAL THAT HAS USED A
SURROGATE COMMITTEE DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR
SHALL REPORT TO THE OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE QUALITY WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT:
(1) THE NUMBER OF TIMES THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE WAS
CONVENED TO MAKE A TREATMENT DECISION FOR AN UNREPRESENTED PATIENT;
AND
(2) FOR EACH UNREPRESENTED PATIENT:
(I) THE NAMES OF THE MEMBERS OF THE SURROGATE
COMMITTEE PRESENT AT THE MEETING AT WHICH THE TREATMENT DECISION WAS
MADE;
(II) A DESCRIPTION OF THE UNREPRESENTED PATIENT’S
CONDITION;
(III) DEMOGRAPHIC INFORMATION REGARDING THE
UNREPRESENTED PATIENT, INCLUDING RACE, SEX, GENDER, AND DISABILITY;
(IV) THE EFFORTS MADE BY THE HOSPITAL TO LOCATE A
SURROGATE;
(V) THE TREATMENT DECISIONS CONSIDERED BY THE
SURROGATE COMMITTEE;
(VI) THE DECISION OF THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE;
(VII) THE BASIS FOR THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE’S DECISION;
(VIII) WHETHER THE UNREPRESENTED PATIENT WAS ABLE TO
LEAVE THE HOSPITAL; AND
(IX) WHETHER THE HOSPITAL WAS REQUIRED TO FILE FOR
GUARDIANSHIP OF THE UNREPRESENTED PATIENT BEFORE DISCHARGE.
(F) (1) A HOSPITAL SHALL MAKE THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC ON REQUEST, WITH
APPROPRIATE REDACTIONS TO PROTECT PATIENT CONFIDENTIALITY.

HOUSE BILL 1323
(2) A HOSPITAL SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ON THE HOSPITAL’S
WEBSITE ALERTING THE PUBLIC OF HOW TO OBTAIN A COPY OF THE REPORT.
5–605.
(a) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Person eligible for relief” has the meaning stated in § 4–501 of
the Family Law Article.
(iii) “Unavailable” means:
1. After reasonable inquiry, a health care provider is
unaware of the existence of a health care agent or surrogate decision maker;
2. After reasonable inquiry, a health care provider cannot
ascertain the whereabouts of a health care agent or surrogate decision maker;
3. A health care agent or surrogate decision maker has not
responded in a timely manner, taking into account the health care needs of the individual,
to a written or oral message from a health care provider;
4. A health care agent or surrogate decision maker is
incapacitated; or
5. A health care agent or surrogate decision maker is
unwilling to make decisions concerning health care for the individual.
(2) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, the following individuals or
groups, in the specified order of priority, may make decisions about health care for a person
who has been certified to be incapable of making an informed decision and who has not
appointed a health care agent in accordance with this subtitle or whose health care agent
is unavailable. Individuals in a particular class may be consulted to make a decision only
if all individuals in the next higher class are unavailable:
(i) A guardian for the patient, if one has been appointed;
(ii) The patient’s spouse or domestic partner;
(iii) An adult child of the patient;
(iv) A parent of the patient;
(v) An adult brother or sister of the patient; [or]

HOUSE BILL 1323 7
(vi) A friend or other relative of the patient who meets the
requirements of paragraph (3) of this subsection; OR
(VII) A SURROGATE COMMITTEE.
(3) A friend or other relative may make decisions about health care for a
patient under paragraph (2) of this subsection if the person:
(i) Is a competent individual; and
(ii) Presents an affidavit to the attending physician stating:
1. That the person is a relative or close friend of the patient;
and
2. Specific facts and circumstances demonstrating that the
person has maintained regular contact with the patient sufficient to be familiar with the
patient’s activities, health, and personal beliefs.
(4) An individual may not make decisions about health care for a patient
under paragraph (2) of this subsection if:
(i) The individual is the subject of an interim, temporary, or final
protective order and the patient is a person eligible for relief under the order; or
(ii) The individual is the spouse of the patient and:
1. The individual and patient have executed a separation
agreement; or
2. The individual or patient has filed an application for
divorce.
(5) The attending physician shall include the affidavit presented under
paragraph (3) of this subsection in the patient’s medical record.
(6) A person who obtains new information that would prohibit an
individual from making health care decisions for a patient under paragraph (4) of this
subsection shall provide the information to any health care provider or health care facility
providing services to the patient.
(7) (I) IF AN UNREPRESENTED PATIENT’S ATTENDING PHYSICIAN
DETERMINES THAT THERE IS A NEED TO MAKE HEALTH CARE DECISIONS FOR THE
UNREPRESENTED PATIENT, THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN SHALL CONVENE THE
SURROGATE COMMITTEE.

HOUSE BILL 1323
(II) THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE SHALL MEET PROMPTLY.
(III) IF PRACTICABLE, ALL SURROGATE COMMITTEE MEMBERS
SHALL PERSONALLY OBSERVE THE UNREPRESENTED PATIENT BEFORE MAKING A
TREATMENT DECISION.
(IV) THE FINAL DECISION OF THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE
MUST BE SUPPORTED BY A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST TWO OF THE MEMBERS LISTED IN §
5–604.2(B)(1) THROUGH (4) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. AT LEAST TWO OF THE MEMBERS LISTED IN §
5–604.2(B)(5) THROUGH (7) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) (1) If persons with equal decision making priority under subsection (a) of
this section disagree about a health care decision, and a person who is incapable of making
an informed decision is receiving care in a hospital or related institution, the attending
physician or an individual specified in subsection (a) of this section shall refer the case to
the institution’s patient care advisory committee, and may act in accordance with the
recommendation of the committee or transfer the patient in accordance with the provisions
of § 5–613 of this subtitle. A physician who acts in accordance with the recommendation of
the committee is not subject to liability for any claim based on lack of consent or
authorization for the action.
(2) If a person who is incapable of making an informed decision is not in a
hospital or related institution, a physician may not withhold or withdraw life–sustaining
procedures if there is not agreement among all the persons in the same class.
(c) (1) Any person authorized to make health care decisions for another under
this section shall base those decisions on the wishes of the patient and, if the wishes of the
patient are unknown or unclear, on the patient’s best interest.
(2) In determining the wishes of the patient, a surrogate shall consider the
patient’s:
(i) Current diagnosis and prognosis with and without the treatment
at issue;
(ii) Expressed preferences regarding the provision of, or the
withholding or withdrawal of, the specific treatment at issue or of similar treatments;
(iii) Relevant religious and moral beliefs and personal values;
(iv) Behavior, attitudes, and past conduct with respect to the
treatment at issue and medical treatment generally;

HOUSE BILL 1323 9
(v) Reactions to the provision of, or the withholding or withdrawal
of, a similar treatment for another individual; and
(vi) Expressed concerns about the effect on the family or intimate
friends of the patient if a treatment were provided, withheld, or withdrawn.
(3) The decision of a surrogate regarding whether life–sustaining
procedures should be provided, withheld, or withdrawn shall not be based, in whole or in
part, on either a patient’s preexisting, long–term mental or physical disability, or a
patient’s economic disadvantage.
(4) (I) [A] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
A surrogate shall inform the patient, to the extent possible, of the proposed procedure and
the fact that someone else is authorized to make a decision regarding that procedure.
(II) IF A SURROGATE COMMITTEE HAS BEEN CONVENED, A
MEMBER OF THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE SHALL INFORM THE UNREPRESENTED
PATIENT, BOTH ORALLY AND IN WRITING, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THAT:
1. THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE HAS BEEN CONVENED
TO MAKE A TREATMENT DECISION FOR THE UNREPRESENTED PATIENT; AND
2. THE DECISION OF THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE MAY
INCLUDE THE PROVISION, WITHHOLDING, OR WITHDRAWING OF TREATMENT.
(III) THE WRITTEN NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE THE NAMES OF THE MEMBERS OF THE
SURROGATE COMMITTEE.
(5) (I) THE SURROGATE COMMITTEE SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN
EXPLANATION OF, AND THE BASIS FOR, ITS DECISION.
(II) THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN SHALL INCLUDE THE WRITTEN
EXPLANATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IN THE
UNREPRESENTED PATIENT’S MEDICAL RECORD.
(d) (1) A surrogate may not authorize:
[(1)] (I) Sterilization; or
[(2)] (II) Treatment for a mental disorder.
(2) (I) 1. A SURROGATE COMMITTEE MAY NOT AUTHORIZE THE
DISCHARGE OF AN UNREPRESENTED PATIENT.

HOUSE BILL 1323
2. FOR THE PURPOSE OF SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, A REQUEST BY A HOSPITAL TO MOVE THE UNREPRESENTED
PATIENT TO A HIGHER LEVEL OF CARE AT ANOTHER FACILITY MAY NOT BE
CONSIDERED A DISCHARGE.
(II) A SURROGATE COMMITTEE’S DECISION–MAKING
AUTHORITY SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE TIME DURING WHICH THE UNREPRESENTED
PATIENT IS IN THE HOSPITAL.
5–606.
(a) (1) Prior to providing, withholding, or withdrawing treatment for which
authorization has been obtained or will be sought under this subtitle, the attending
physician and a second physician or a nurse practitioner, one of whom shall have examined
the patient within 2 hours before making the certification, shall certify in writing that the
patient is incapable of making an informed decision regarding the treatment. The
certification shall be based on a personal examination of the patient.
(2) If a patient is unconscious, or unable to communicate by any means, the
certification of a second physician or a nurse practitioner is not required under paragraph
(1) of this subsection.
(3) When authorization is sought for treatment of a mental illness, the
second physician or the nurse practitioner may not be otherwise currently involved in the
treatment of the person assessed.
(4) The cost of an assessment to certify incapacity under this subsection
shall be considered for all purposes a cost of the patient’s treatment.
(b) A health care provider may not withhold or withdraw life–sustaining
procedures on the basis of an advance directive where no agent has been appointed or on
the basis of the authorization of a surrogate, unless:
(1) The patient’s attending physician and a second physician or a nurse
practitioner have certified that the patient is in a terminal condition or has an end–stage
condition; or
(2) Two physicians, one of whom is a neurologist, neurosurgeon, or other
physician who has special expertise in the evaluation of cognitive functioning, certify that
the patient is in a persistent vegetative state.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.